Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-212
Township; change of name.

The board shall also at the meeting mentioned in sections 23-208 and 23-209 designate the name of each town, and may change the name of any town at any other meeting of such board upon a petition of a majority of the voters of such town.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 10, p. 134;

R.S.1913, § 996;

C.S.1922, § 898;

C.S.1929, § 26-212;

R.S.1943, § 23-212;

Laws 1961, c. 88, § 1, p. 308.